Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1524
Unfair trade practice; prohibited acts.

It shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance for any insurer, health insurance lead generator, or person engaged in the business of insurance to commit any act or practice defined in section 44-1525 if the act or practice (1) is committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to the act or (2) is committed with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice to engage in that type of conduct.

Laws 1973, LB 349, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB326, § 2.